Illinois, session 104th, HB3024.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Disaster Relief Act is amended by adding 5Section 5 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 30/5 new)7    Sec. 5. Supplemental disaster relief grants.8    (a) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 9Homeland Security may provide State supplemental grants to 10meet disaster-related necessary expenses or serious needs of 11individuals and households adversely affected by any disaster 12declared by the President of the United States in those cases 13in which individuals and households are unable to meet those 14expenses or needs through assistance under Section 408 of the 15federal Robert T. Stafford Disaster Relief and Emergency 16Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. 5174) or from other sources. 17    (b) Grants under this Section shall be made only to 18individuals and households that, in either case, are 19determined, by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 20Office of Homeland Security, to be eligible for federal 21assistance under 42 U.S.C. 5174, that have unmet serious 22needs, and that have suffered losses reimbursable under that 23program in excess of the maximum federal grant amount.   HB3024- 2 -LRB104 08425 SPS 18477 b1    (c) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 2Homeland Security may make a grant to an eligible individual 3or eligible household in an amount equal to the difference 4between the federal grant awarded to the individual or 5household and the federally eligible appraised loss of the 6individual or household, not to exceed $10,000 per individual 7or household. 8    (d) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 9Homeland Security shall adopt rules establishing application 10procedures for grants awarded under this Section. The adopted 11rules must, at a minimum, specify that: 12        (1) all application procedures must conform to the 13    procedures required in the federal Robert T. Stafford 14    Disaster Relief and Emergency Assistance Act, as amended; 15        (2) the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 16    Office of Homeland Security must ensure that applicants 17    for relief under this Section have exhausted all other 18    available means of seeking relief for disaster damage 19    prior to receiving any grants under this Section; 20        (3) all applications, forms, and other written 21    materials to be presented to persons seeking assistance 22    must be available in English and in the same language as 23    that used by the largest non-English-speaking population 24    within the disaster area; and 25        (4) bilingual staff who reflect the demographics of 26    the disaster area must be available to applicants.